Maryland, session 2026, HB1564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–1114.
A PERSON DOING BUSINESS IN THE STATE MAY NOT KNOWINGLY
MANUFACTURE OR SELL, DISTRIBUTE, DISPENSE, OR OTHERWISE SUPPLY A DRUG
OR MEDICAL DEVICE OR COMPOUND A DRUG IF THE PERSON KNOWS OR
REASONABLY SHOULD KNOW THAT THE ORDER, PRESCRIPTION, OR OTHER
AUTHORIZATION FOR THE MANUFACTURE, COMPOUNDING, OR SUPPLYING OF THE
DRUG OR DEVICE WAS PROMPTED, EITHER DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, BY A PERSON
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1564*

HOUSE BILL 1564
SEEKING THE DRUG OR DEVICE WITH THE INTENT THAT THE DRUG OR DEVICE WILL
BE USED TO CARRY OUT A DEATH SENTENCE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.